Utah statutes.
78B-2-205.   Seizure or possession within seven years -- Proviso -- Tax title.

(1)  An action for the recovery or possession of real property may not be maintained, unless the plaintiff or his predecessor owned or possessed the property within seven years before the commencement of the action.

(2)  Actions or defenses brought to recover, take possession of, quiet title, or determine the ownership of real property against the holder of a tax title to the property, may not be commenced more than four years after the date of the tax deed, conveyance, or transfer creating the tax title unless the person commencing the action or defense or his predecessor has actually occupied or been in possession of the property within four years prior to the commencement of the action or defense.

